North Carolina, session 2025, HB1124.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. INTERSTATE COMPACT FOR SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGISTS
SECTION 1.(a) Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 17F.
"School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact.
"§ 115C-270.40. Purpose.
The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate the interstate practice of School Psychology in
educational or school settings, and in so doing to improve the availability of School
Psychological Services to the public. This Compact is intended to establish a pathway to allow
School Psychologists to obtain equivalent licenses to provide School Psychological Services in
any Member State. In this way, this Compact shall enable the Member States to ensure that safe
and effective School Psychological Services are available and delivered by appropriately
qualified professionals in their educational settings. To facilitate the objectives described above,
this Compact does the following:
(1) Enables School Psychologists who qualify for receipt of an Equivalent
License to practice in other Member States without first satisfying
burdensome and duplicative requirements.
(2) Promotes the mobility of School Psychologists between and among the
Member States in order to address workforce shortages and to ensure that safe
and reliable School Psychological Services are available in each Member
State.
(3) Enhances the public accessibility of School Psychological Services by
increasing the availability of qualified, licensed School Psychologists through
the establishment of an efficient and streamlined pathway for Licensees to
practice in other Member States.
(4) Preserves and respects the authority of each Member State to protect the health
and safety of its residents by ensuring that only qualified, licensed
*H1124-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
professionals are authorized to provide School Psychological Services within
that state.
(5) Requires School Psychologists practicing within a Member State to comply
with the Scope of Practice laws present in the state where the School
Psychological Services are being provided.
(6) Promotes cooperation between the Member States in regulating the practice
of School Psychology within those states.
(7) Facilitates the relocation of military members and their spouses who are
licensed to provide School Psychological Services.
"§ 115C-270.41. Definitions.
The following definitions shall apply in this Article:
(1) Active Military Member. – Any person with full-time duty status in the Armed
Forces of the United States, including members of the National Guard and
Reserve.
(2) Adverse Action. – Disciplinary action or encumbrance imposed on a License
by a State Licensing Authority.
(3) Alternative Program. – A nondisciplinary, prosecutorial diversion,
monitoring, or practice remediation process entered into in lieu of an Adverse
Action which is applicable to a School Psychologist and approved by the State
Licensing Authority of a Member State in which the participating School
Psychologist is licensed. This includes, but is not limited to, programs to
which Licensees with substance abuse or addiction issues may be referred in
lieu of an Adverse Action.
(4) Commissioner. – The individual appointed by a Member State to serve as the
representative to the Commission for that Member State.
(5) Compact. – This School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact.
(6) Continuing Professional Education. – A requirement, imposed by a Member
State as a condition of License renewal to provide evidence of successful
participation in professional educational activities relevant to the provision of
School Psychological Services.
(7) Criminal Background Check. – The submission of fingerprints or other
biometric information for a License applicant for the purpose of obtaining that
applicant's criminal history record information, as defined in 28 C.F.R. §
20.3(d), and the state's criminal history record repository, as defined in 28
C.F.R. § 20.3(f).
(8) Doctoral Level Degree. – A graduate degree program that consists of at least
90 graduate semester hours in the field of School Psychology, including a
supervised internship.
(9) Encumbered License. – A License that a State Licensing Authority has limited
in any way other than through an Alternative Program, including temporary
or provisional licenses.
(10) Equivalent License. – A License to practice School Psychology which a
Member State has identified as a License which may be provided to School
Psychologists from other Member States pursuant to this Compact.
(11) Executive Committee. – The Commission's Chair, Vice-Chair, Secretary, and
Treasurer and any other Commissioners as may be determined by
Commission Rule or bylaw.
(12) Home State. – The Member State that issued the Home State License to the
Licensee and is the Licensee's primary state of practice.
(13) Home State License. – The License that is not an Encumbered License issued
by the Home State to provide School Psychological Services.
Page 2 House Bill 1124-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(14) License. – A current license, certification, or other authorization granted by a
Member State's Licensing Authority that permits an individual to provide
School Psychological Services.
(15) Licensee. – An individual who holds a License from a Member State to
provide School Psychological Services.
(16) Member State. – A state that has enacted the Compact and been admitted to
the Commission in accordance with the provisions herein and Commission
Rules.
(17) Model Compact. – The model language for the School Psychologist Interstate
Licensure Compact on file with the Council of State Governments or other
entity as designated by the Commission.
(18) Practice of School Psychology. – The delivery of School Psychological
Services.
(19) Qualifying National Exam. – A national licensing examination endorsed by
the National Association of School Psychologists and any other exam as
approved by the Rules of the Commission.
(20) Qualifying School Psychologist Education Program. – An education program
which awards a Specialist-Level or Doctoral-Level degree or equivalent upon
completion and is approved by the Rules of the Commission as meeting the
necessary minimum educational standards to ensure that its graduates are
ready, qualified, and able to engage in the Practice of School Psychology.
(21) Remote State. – A Member State other than the Home State where a Licensee
holds a License through the Compact.
(22) Rule. – A regulation promulgated by an entity, including, but not limited to,
the Commission and the State Licensing Authority of each Member State, that
has the force of law.
(23) School Psychological Services. – Academic, mental, and behavioral health
services, including assessment, prevention, consultation and collaboration,
intervention, and evaluation provided by a School Psychologist in a school, as
outlined in applicable professional standards as determined by Commission
Rule.
(24) School Psychologist. – An individual who has met the requirements to obtain
a Home State License that legally conveys the professional title of School
Psychologist, or its equivalent, as determined by the Rules of the Commission.
(25) School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact Commission
(Commission). – The joint government agency established by this Compact
whose membership consists of representatives from each Member State that
has enacted the Compact, and as further described in G.S. 115C-270.46.
(26) Scope of Practice. – The procedures, actions, and processes a School
Psychologist licensed in a state is permitted to undertake in that state and the
circumstances under which that Licensee is permitted to undertake those
procedures, actions, and processes. Such procedures, actions, and processes,
and the circumstances under which they may be undertaken, may be
established through means, including, but not limited to, statute, regulations,
case law, and other processes available to the State Licensing Authority or
other government agency.
(27) Specialist-Level Degree. – A degree program that requires at least 60 graduate
semester hours or equivalent in the field of School Psychology, including a
supervised internship.
(28) State. – Any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United States of
America.
House Bill 1124-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(29) State Licensing Authority. – A Member State's regulatory body responsible
for issuing Licenses or otherwise overseeing the Practice of School
Psychology.
(30) State Specific Requirement. – A requirement for licensure covered in
coursework or examination that includes content of unique interest to the state.
(31) Unencumbered License. – A License that authorizes a Licensee to engage in
the full and unrestricted Practice of School Psychology.
"§ 115C-270.42. State participation in the Compact.
(a) To be eligible to join this Compact, and to maintain eligibility as a Member State, a
state must do the following:
(1) Enact a Compact statute that is not materially different from the Model
Compact as defined in the Commission's Rules.
(2) Participate in the sharing of information with other Member States as
reasonably necessary to accomplish the objectives of this Compact, and as
further defined in G.S. 115C-270.47.
(3) Identify and maintain with the Commission a list of Equivalent Licenses
available to Licensees who hold a Home State License under this Compact.
(4) Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating complaints about
Licensees.
(5) Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms of the Compact and the
Commission's Rules, of any Adverse Action taken against a Licensee, or of
the availability of investigative information which relates to a Licensee or
applicant for licensure.
(6) Require that applicants for a Home State License have done the following:
a. Taken and passed a Qualifying National Exam as defined by the Rules
of the Commission.
b. Completed a minimum of 1,200 hours of supervised internship, of
which at least 600 must have been completed in a School, prior to
being approved for licensure.
c. Graduated from a Qualifying School Psychologist Education Program.
(7) Comply with the terms of this Compact and the Rules of the Commission.
(b) Each Member State shall grant an Equivalent License to practice School Psychology
in that state upon application by a Licensee who satisfies the criteria of G.S. 115C-270.43(a).
Each Member State shall grant renewal of the Equivalent License to a Licensee who satisfies the
criteria of G.S. 115C-270.43(b).
(c) Member States may set and collect a fee for granting an Equivalent License.
"§ 115C-270.43. School psychologist participation in the Compact.
(a) To obtain and maintain an Equivalent License from a Remote State under this
Compact, a Licensee must satisfy the following:
(1) Hold and maintain an active Home State License.
(2) Satisfy any applicable State Specific Requirements established by the
Member State after an Equivalent License is granted.
(3) Complete any administrative or application requirements which the
Commission may establish by Rule and pay any associated fees.
(4) Complete any requirements for renewal in the Home State, including
applicable Continuing Professional Education requirements.
(5) Upon their application to receive a license under this Compact, undergo a
criminal background check in the Member State in which the Equivalent
License is sought in accordance with the laws and regulations of such Member
State.
Page 4 House Bill 1124-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) To renew an Equivalent License in a Member State other than the Home State, a
Licensee must only apply for renewal, complete a background check, and pay renewal fees as
determined by the Licensing Authority.
"§ 115C-270.44. Active Military Members or their spouses.
A Licensee who is an Active Military Member or is the spouse of an Active Military Member
shall be deemed to hold a Home State License in any of the following locations:
(1) The Licensee's permanent residence.
(2) A Member State that is the Licensee's primary state of practice.
(3) A Member State where the Licensee has relocated pursuant to a Permanent
Change of Station (PCS).
"§ 115C-270.45. Discipline/adverse actions.
(a) Nothing in this Compact shall be deemed or construed to limit the authority of a
Member State to investigate or impose disciplinary measures on Licensees according to the State
Practice Laws thereof.
(b) Member States shall be authorized to receive, and shall provide, files and information
regarding the investigation and discipline, if any, of Licensees in other Member States upon
request. Any Member State receiving such information or files shall protect and maintain the
security and confidentiality thereof, in at least the same manner that it maintains its own
investigatory or disciplinary files and information. Prior to disclosing any disciplinary or
investigatory information received from another Member State, the disclosing state shall
communicate its intention and purpose for such disclosure to the Member State which originally
provided that information.
"§ 115C-270.46. Establishment of the School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact
Commission.
(a) The Member States hereby create and establish a joint government agency whose
membership consists of all Member States that have enacted the Compact, and this agency shall
be known as the School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact Commission. The
Commission is an instrumentality of the Member States acting jointly and not an instrumentality
of any one state. The Commission shall come into existence on or after the effective date of the
Compact as set forth in G.S. 115C-270.50.
(b) Membership, Voting, and Meetings.
(1) Each Member State shall have and be limited to one delegate selected by that
Member State's State Licensing Authority.
(2) The delegate shall be the primary administrative officer of the Member State
Licensing Authority or their designee who is an employee of the Member
State Licensing Authority.
(3) The Commission shall by Rule or bylaw establish a term of office for
delegates and may by Rule or bylaw establish term limits.
(4) The Commission may recommend removal or suspension of any delegate
from office.
(5) A Member State's Licensing Authority shall fill any vacancy of its delegate
occurring on the Commission within 60 days of the vacancy.
(6) Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all matters before the
Commission requiring a vote by Commission delegates.
(7) A delegate shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the
bylaws. The bylaws may provide for delegates to meet by telecommunication,
videoconference, or other means of communication.
(8) The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year.
Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The Commission
may meet by telecommunication, video conference, or other similar electronic
means.
House Bill 1124-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) The Commission shall have the following powers:
(1) Establish the fiscal year of the Commission.
(2) Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies.
(3) Establish and amend Rules and bylaws.
(4) Establish the procedure through which a Licensee may change their Home
State.
(5) Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws.
(6) Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this
Compact, the Commission's Rules, and the bylaws.
(7) Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the
Commission, provided that the standing of any Member State Licensing
Authority to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected.
(8) Maintain and certify records and information provided to a Member State as
the authenticated business records of the Commission and designate an agent
to do so on the Commission's behalf.
(9) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds.
(10) Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but not
limited to, employees of a Member State.
(11) Conduct an annual financial review.
(12) Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties,
grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the
Compact, and establish the Commission's personnel policies and programs
relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related
personnel matters.
(13) Assess and collect fees.
(14) Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of money, other sources
of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and services and receive, utilize,
and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the Commission shall avoid
any appearance of impropriety and/or conflict of interest.
(15) Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any property, real,
personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein.
(16) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise
dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed.
(17) Establish a budget and make expenditures.
(18) Borrow money.
(19) Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of members,
state regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and consumer
representatives, and such other interested persons as may be designated in this
Compact and the bylaws.
(20) Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement
agencies.
(21) Establish and elect an Executive Committee, including a Chair and a
Vice-Chair.
(22) Determine whether a state's adopted language is materially different from the
Model Compact language such that the state would not qualify for
participation in the Compact.
(23) Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve
the purposes of this Compact.
(d) The Executive Committee.
Page 6 House Bill 1124-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the
Commission according to the terms of this Compact. The powers, duties, and
responsibilities of the Executive Committee shall include the following:
a. Oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration of the Compact,
including enforcement and compliance with the provisions of the
Compact, its Rules and bylaws, and other such duties as deemed
necessary.
b. Recommend to the Commission changes to the Rules or bylaws,
changes to this Compact legislation, fees charged to Member States,
fees charged to Licensees, and other fees.
c. Ensure Compact administration services are appropriately provided,
including by contract.
d. Prepare and recommend the budget.
e. Maintain financial records on behalf of the Commission.
f. Monitor Compact compliance of Member States and provide
compliance reports to the Commission.
g. Establish additional committees as necessary.
h. Exercise the powers and duties of the Commission during the interim
between Commission meetings, except for adopting or amending
Rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers
and duties expressly reserved to the Commission by Rule or bylaw.
i. Other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws of the Commission.
(2) The Executive Committee shall be composed of up to seven members as
follows:
a. The Chair and Vice-Chair of the Commission shall be voting members
of the Executive Committee.
b. The Commission shall elect five voting members from the current
membership of the Commission.
(3) The Commission may remove any member of the Executive Committee as
provided in the Commission's bylaws.
(4) The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually as follows:
a. Executive Committee meetings shall be open to the public, except that
the Executive Committee may meet in a closed, nonpublic meeting as
provided in subdivision (2) of subsection (f) of this section.
b. The Executive Committee shall give 30 days' notice of its meetings,
posted on its website and as determined to provide notice to persons
with an interest in the business of the Commission.
c. The Executive Committee may hold a special meeting in accordance
with sub-subdivision b. of subdivision (1) of subsection (f) of this
section.
(e) The Commission shall adopt and provide to the Member States an annual report.
(f) Meetings of the Commission.
(1) All meetings shall be open to the public as follows, except that the
Commission may meet in a closed, nonpublic meeting as provided in
subdivision (2) of this subsection.
a. Public notice for all meetings of the full Commission shall be given in
the same manner as required under the Rulemaking provisions in
G.S. 115C-270.48, except that the Commission may hold a special
meeting as provided in sub-subdivision b. of this subdivision.
b. The Commission may hold a special meeting when it must meet to
conduct emergency business by giving 48 hours' notice to all
House Bill 1124-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
commissioners, on the Commission's website, and other means as
provided in the Commission's Rules. The Commission's legal counsel
shall certify that the Commission's need to meet qualifies as an
emergency.
(2) The Commission or the Executive Committee or other committees of the
Commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting for the Commission
or Executive Committee or other committees of the Commission to receive
legal advice or to discuss the following:
a. Noncompliance of a Member State with its obligations under the
Compact.
b. The employment, compensation, discipline, or other matters,
practices, or procedures related to specific employees.
c. Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee by the Commission or
by a Member State's Licensing Authority.
d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation.
e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods,
services, or real estate.
f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person.
g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged
or confidential.
h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a
clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy.
i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes.
j. Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on
behalf of or for use of the Commission or other committee charged
with responsibility of investigation or determination of compliance
issues pursuant to the Compact.
k. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or Member
State law.
l. Other matters as promulgated by the Commission by Rule.
(3) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding officer shall state
that the meeting will be closed and reference each relevant exempting
provision, and such reference shall be recorded in the minutes.
(4) The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all matters
discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of
actions taken, and the reasons therefore, including a description of the views
expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action shall be
identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting
shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a majority vote of the
Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
(g) Financing of the Commission.
(1) The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable
expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
(2) The Commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources as
provided in subdivision (13) of subsection (c) of this section.
(3) The Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each
Member State and impose fees on Licensees practicing in the Member States
under an Equivalent License to cover the cost of the operations and activities
of the Commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient to
cover its annual budget as approved each year for which revenue is not
provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for
Page 8 House Bill 1124-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Member States shall be allocated based upon a formula that the Commission
shall promulgate by Rule.
(4) The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the
funds adequate to meet the same, nor shall the Commission pledge the credit
of any of the Member States, except by and with the authority of the Member
State.
(5) The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be
subject to the financial review and accounting procedures established under
its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the
Commission shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified or
licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be
included in and become part of the annual report of the Commission.
(h) Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification.
(1) The members, officers, executive director, employees, and representatives of
the Commission shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally and
in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or
personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or
alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom
the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that
nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to protect any such person from
suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The procurement
of insurance of any type by the Commission shall not in any way compromise
or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
(2) The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director,
employee, and representative of the Commission in any civil action seeking
to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission
that occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, or as determined by the Commission that the person against
whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within
the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided
that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining
their own counsel at their own expense; and provided further, that the actual
or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person's intentional
or willful or wanton misconduct.
(3) The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer,
executive director, employee, and representative of the Commission for the
amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out
of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope
of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such person
had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of Commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act,
error, or omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton
misconduct of that person.
(4) Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of any
licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed
solely by any other applicable state laws.
(5) Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate a
Member State's state action immunity or state action affirmative defense with
House Bill 1124-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
respect to antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any other
state or federal antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.
(6) Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign
immunity by the Member States or by the Commission.
"§ 115C-270.47. Facilitating information exchange.
(a) The Commission shall provide for facilitating the exchange of information to
administer and implement the provisions of this Compact in accordance with the Rules of the
Commission, consistent with generally accepted data protection principles.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a Member State shall
agree to provide for the facilitation of the following Licensee information as required by the
Rules of the Commission, including:
(1) Identifying information.
(2) Licensure data.
(3) Adverse Actions against a Licensee and information related thereto.
(4) Nonconfidential information related to Alternative Program participation, the
beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other information
related to such participation not made confidential under Member State law.
(5) Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason(s) for such denial.
(6) The presence of investigative information.
(7) Other information that may facilitate the administration of this Compact or the
protection of the public, as determined by the Rules of the Commission.
(c) Nothing in this Compact shall be deemed or construed to alter, limit, or inhibit the
power of a Member State to control and maintain ownership of its Licensee information or alter,
limit, or inhibit the laws or regulations governing Licensee information in the Member State.
"§ 115C-270.48. Rulemaking.
(a) The Commission shall exercise its Rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set
forth in this interstate compact and the Rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall
become binding as of the date specified in each Rule or amendment.
(b) The Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules to achieve the intent and purpose
of this interstate compact. In the event the Commission exercises its Rulemaking authority in a
manner that is beyond the purpose and intent of this interstate compact, or the powers granted
hereunder, then such an action by the Commission shall be invalid and have no force and effect
of law in the Member States.
(c) If a majority of the legislatures of the Member States reject a Rule, by enactment of a
statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the Compact within four years of the date
of adoption of the Rule, then such Rule shall have no further force and effect in any Member
State.
(d) Rules or amendments to the Rules shall be adopted or ratified at a regular or special
meeting of the Commission in accordance with Commission Rules and bylaws.
(e) Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final Rule or Rules by the Commission, and
at least 30 days in advance of the meeting at which the Rule will be considered and voted upon,
the Commission shall file a notice of proposed Rulemaking:
(1) On the website of the Commission or other publicly accessible platform; and
(2) On the website of each Member State Licensing Authority or other publicly
accessible platform or the publication in which each state would otherwise
publish proposed Rules.
(f) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may consider and
adopt an emergency Rule with 48 hours' notice, with opportunity to comment, provided that the
usual Rulemaking procedures shall be retroactively applied to the Rule as soon as reasonably
possible, in no event later than 90 days after the effective date of the Rule. For the purposes of
Page 10 House Bill 1124-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
this provision, an emergency Rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to accomplish
the following:
(1) Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare.
(2) Prevent a loss of Commission or Member State funds.
(3) Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative Rule that is
established by federal law or Rule.
(4) Protect public health and safety.
"§ 115C-270.49. Oversight, dispute resolution, and enforcement.
(a) Oversight.
(1) The executive and judicial branches of the state government in each Member
State shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate
to implement the Compact.
(2) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the Commission shall
be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where
the principal office of the Commission is located. The Commission may waive
venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to
participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall
affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in any action against a
Licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct, or any such similar matter.
(3) The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any
proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the Compact and
shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure
to provide the Commission service of process shall render a judgment or order
void as to the Commission, this Compact, or promulgated Rules.
(b) Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination.
(1) If the Commission determines that a Member State has defaulted in the
performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact or the
promulgated Rules, the Commission shall provide written notice to the
defaulting state. The notice of default shall describe the default, the proposed
means of curing the default, and any other action that the Commission may
take and shall offer training and specific technical assistance regarding the
default.
(2) The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the other
Member States.
(c) If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be terminated
from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a supermajority of the delegates of the Member
States, and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred on that state by this Compact may be
terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the
offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
(d) Termination of membership in the Compact shall be imposed only after all other
means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate
shall be given by the Commission to the governor, the majority and minority leaders of the
defaulting state's legislature, the defaulting State's Licensing Authority, and each of the Member
States' Licensing Authorities.
(e) A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and
liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend
beyond the effective date of termination.
(f) Upon the termination of a state's membership from this Compact, that state shall
immediately provide notice to all Licensees within that state of such termination. The terminated
state shall continue to recognize all Licenses granted pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of
six months after the date of said notice of termination.
House Bill 1124-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(g) The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in default
or that has been terminated from the Compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the
Commission and the defaulting state.
(h) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Commission by petitioning the U.S.
District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including
reasonable attorneys' fees.
(i) Dispute Resolution.
(1) Upon request by a Member State, the Commission shall attempt to resolve
disputes related to the Compact that arise among Member States and between
Member and non-Member States.
(2) The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for both mediation and
binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
(j) Enforcement.
(1) By majority vote as provided by Rule, the Commission may initiate legal
action against a Member State in default in the U.S. District Court for the
District of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission has its
principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the Compact
and its promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive
relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the
prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including
reasonable attorneys' fees. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive
remedies of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other
remedies available under federal or the defaulting Member State's law.
(2) A Member State may initiate legal action against the Commission in the U.S.
District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the
Commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the
provisions of the Compact and its promulgated Rules. The relief sought may
include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement
is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation,
including reasonable attorneys' fees.
(3) No person other than a Member State shall enforce this Compact against the
Commission.
"§ 115C-270.50. Effective date, withdrawal, and amendment.
(a) The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the Compact statute is
enacted into law in the seventh Member State.
(1) On or after the effective date of the Compact indicated above, the Commission
shall convene and review the enactment of each of the Charter Member States
to determine if the statute enacted by each such Charter Member State is
materially different than the model Compact statute.
a. A Charter Member State whose enactment is found to be materially
different from the model Compact statute shall be entitled to the
default process set forth in G.S. 115C-270.49.
b. If any Member State is later found to be in default, or is terminated or
withdraws from the Compact, the Commission shall remain in
existence and the Compact shall remain in effect even if the number
of Member States should be less than seven.
(2) Member States enacting the Compact subsequent to the Charter Member
States shall be subject to the process set forth in subdivision (22) of subsection
(c) of G.S. 115C-470.46 to determine if their enactments are materially
Page 12 House Bill 1124-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
different from the model Compact statute and whether they qualify for
participation in the Compact.
(3) All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in furtherance of the
purposes of the administration of the Compact prior to the effective date of
the Compact or the Commission coming into existence shall be considered to
be actions of the Commission unless specifically repudiated by the
Commission.
a. Any state that joins the Compact subsequent to the Commission's
initial adoption of the Rules and bylaws shall be subject to the Rules
and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the Compact becomes
law in that state. Any Rule that has been previously adopted by the
Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the
Compact becomes law in that state.
b. Any Member State may withdraw from this Compact by enacting a
statute repealing the same.
(b) A Member State's withdrawal shall not take effect until 180 days after enactment of
the repealing statute.
(c) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing State's
Licensing Authority to comply with the investigative and Adverse Action reporting requirements
of this Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
(d) Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this Compact, a state shall
immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all Licensees within that state.
Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing state
shall continue to recognize all Licenses granted pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of six
months after the date of such notice of withdrawal.
(1) Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent
any licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a Member
State and a non-Member State that does not conflict with the provisions of this
Compact.
(2) This Compact may be amended by the Member States. No amendment to this
Compact shall become effective and binding upon any Member State until it
is enacted into the laws of all Member States.
"§ 115C-270.51. Construction and severability.
(a) This Compact and the Commission's Rulemaking authority shall be liberally
construed so as to effectuate the purposes and the implementation and administration of the
Compact. Provisions of the Compact expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation of
Rules shall not be construed to limit the Commission's Rulemaking authority solely for those
purposes.
(b) The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence,
or provision of this Compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the
constitution of any Member State, a state seeking participation in the Compact, or of the United
States, or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held to
be unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this
Compact and the applicability thereof to any other government, agency, person, or circumstance
shall not be affected thereby.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, the Commission may deny a state's
participation in the Compact or, in accordance with the requirements of subsection (b) of
G.S. 115C-270.49, terminate a Member State's participation in the Compact, if it determines that
a constitutional requirement of a Member State is a material departure from the Compact.
Otherwise, if this Compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any Member State,
House Bill 1124-First Edition Page 13

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the Compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining Member States and in full
force and effect as to the Member State affected as to all severable matters.
"§ 115C-270.52. Consistent effect and conflict with other state laws.
(a) Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law of a Member
State that is not inconsistent with the Compact.
(b) Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a Member State in
conflict with the Compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict. All permissible agreements
between the Commission and the Member States are binding in accordance with their terms."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115C-12 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(51) Duty to Fulfill Requirements Related to School Psychologist Interstate
Licensure Compact. – The State Board of Education shall be the State
Licensing Authority or Licensing Authority for purposes of Article 17F of this
Chapter and shall fulfill any requirements, duties, or obligations of the State
Licensing Authority or Licensing Authority pursuant to that Article."
SECTION 1.(c) This section is effective when it becomes law.

PART II. APPROPRIATION FOR ECU VIRTUAL SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGY
TRAINING PROGRAM
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to East Carolina University (ECU) to host a
virtual school psychology training program at the ECU campus in Greenville, North Carolina.
Funds appropriated in this section shall not revert but shall remain available until June 30, 2029.

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 14 House Bill 1124-First Edition